Georgia, session 2025_26, HB115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
13 SECTION 1.
14 Chapter 7 of Title 52 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to registration,
15 operation, and sale of watercraft, is amended in Code Section 52-7-5, relating to numbering
16 of vessels, requirements, and fees, by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
H. B. 115 (SUB)
- 1 -

25 LC 39 4617S
17 "(d.1) The application for registration of vessels pursuant to this Code section shall include
18 a statement informing the applicant of the criminal consequences for failure to remove an
19 abandoned vessel from public waters of this state or public property pursuant to
20 subsection (d) of Code Section 52-7-72.1."
21 SECTION 2.
22 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 52-7-70, relating to definitions relative to
23 abandoned vessels, by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
24 "(2.1) 'Public waters' means any waters within the territorial limits of this state and the
25 marginal sea adjacent to this state and the high seas when navigated as a part of a journey
26 or ride to or from the shore of this state. Such term shall not include privately owned
27 ponds or lakes not open to the public."
28 SECTION 3.
29 Said chapter is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
30 "52-7-70.1.
31 (a) Any law enforcement officer or individual authorized by the Department of Natural
32 Resources who discovers a vessel on public property or in public waters that has been left
33 unattended shall immediately perform an unattended vessel check on such vessel, unless
34 an unattended vessel check card is displayed on such vessel indicating that such check has
35 been previously performed. For purposes of this Code section, the term 'unattended vessel
36 check' means and consists of such actions as are reasonably necessary to determine that the
37 unattended vessel does not contain an injured or incapacitated person and to determine that
38 the unattended vessel does not pose a threat to public health or safety.
39 (b) Any law enforcement officer or individual authorized by the Department of Natural
40 Resources who completes an unattended vessel check shall attach the completed
41 unattended vessel check card to the vessel. Unattended vessel check cards shall be in such
H. B. 115 (SUB)
- 2 -

25 LC 39 4617S
42 form and shall be attached to vessels in such manner as determined by the Department of
43 Natural Resources.
44 (c) It shall be unlawful for any person other than a law enforcement officer or individual
45 authorized by the Department of Natural Resources to attach any object purporting to be
46 an unattended vessel check card to a vessel. Any person convicted of violating this
47 subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
48 (d) Within 24 hours of completing an unattended vessel check or discovering an
49 unattended vessel which displays an unattended vessel check card issued by a law
50 enforcement officer or individual authorized by the Department of Natural Resources, a
51 law enforcement officer shall query the criminal justice information system to determine
52 if the unattended vessel has been entered into such system as a stolen vessel. If the
53 unattended vessel has been reported as stolen, the law enforcement officer shall notify the
54 Department of Natural Resources and the law enforcement agency that filed such report,
55 providing the location of the vessel. The law enforcement agency receiving such
56 notification shall then notify the owner of the vessel of the location of the vessel.
57 (e) Failure of a law enforcement officer or the Department of Natural Resources to comply
58 with any provision of this Code section shall not limit the remedies available to any person
59 pursuant to this article."
60 SECTION 4.
61 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 52-7-71, relating to removal and
62 storage of vessels and procedure, as follows:
63 "52-7-71.
64 (a) Any person who that removes a vessel from public property or public water at the
65 request of a law enforcement officer or stores such vessel shall, if the owner of the vessel
66 is unknown, seek the identity of and address of the last known registered owner of such
67 vessel from the law enforcement officer requesting removal of such vessel or such officer's
H. B. 115 (SUB)
- 3 -

25 LC 39 4617S
68 agency Department of Natural Resources within 72 hours of removal. If a person removing
69 or storing the vessel has knowledge of facts which reasonably indicate that the vessel is
70 registered or titled in a certain other state, such person shall check the vessel records of that
71 other state in the attempt to ascertain the identity of the owner of the vessel.
72 (b)(1) Any person who that removes a vessel from private property or private waters at
73 the request of the property owner or stores such vessel shall, if the owner of the vessel is
74 unknown, notify in writing a local law enforcement agency of the location of the vessel,
75 the vessel certificate of number, and the hull identification number, model, year, and
76 make of the vessel, if known or if readily ascertainable, within 72 hours of the removal
77 of such vessel and shall seek from the local law enforcement agency seek the identity of
78 and address of the last known registered owner of such vessel and any information
79 indicating that such vessel is a stolen vessel from the Department of Natural Resources
80 within 72 hours of removal. If a person removing or storing the vessel has knowledge
81 of facts which reasonably indicate that the vessel is registered or titled in a certain other
82 state, such person shall check the vessel records of that other state in the attempt to
83 ascertain the identity of the owner of the vessel.
84 (2) Any person that removes a vessel pursuant to this subsection shall submit notification
85 of the removal by hand delivery, electronic transmission, or telephonic facsimile
86 transmission to the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the location from
87 where the vessel was removed no later than one day after submission of the request
88 required by paragraph (1) of this subsection. Within 24 hours of receipt of such
89 notification of removal of a vessel from private property, the local law enforcement
90 agency shall query the criminal justice information system to determine if such vessel has
91 been entered into the criminal justice information system as a stolen vessel. If the vessel
92 has been reported as stolen, the local law enforcement agency shall notify the law
93 enforcement agency that filed such report, providing the name and address of the person
94 who submitted the notice of removal. The law enforcement agency receiving such
H. B. 115 (SUB)
- 4 -

25 LC 39 4617S
95 notification shall then notify the person who filed the police report for the stolen vessel
96 of the location of such vessel and the contact information for the person that removed the
97 vessel.
98 (c) The Department of Natural Resources may charge a fee of no more than $2.00 for any
99 information requested pursuant to this Code section. Such department shall furnish the
100 requested owner information no later than five days from the date the request was received
101 or when the information is made available. If any vessel removed under conditions set
102 forth in subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section is determined to be a stolen vessel, the
103 local law enforcement officer or agency shall notify the Georgia Crime Information Center
104 and the owner, if known, of the location of such vessel within 72 hours after receiving
105 notice that such vessel is a stolen vessel.
106 (d) If any vessel removed under conditions set forth in subsection (a) or (b) of this Code
107 section is determined not to be a stolen vessel or is not a vessel being repaired by a repair
108 facility or is not being stored by an insurance company providing insurance to cover
109 damages to the vessel, the person removing or storing such vessel shall, within seven
110 calendar days of the day such vessel was removed, notify the owner, if known, by:
111 (1) By certified or registered mail or statutory overnight delivery within seven calendar
112 days of removal, notify the owner of the location of such vessel, the fees connected with
113 removal and storage of such vessel, and the fact that such vessel will be deemed
114 abandoned under this article unless the owner redeems such vessel within 30 days of the
115 date such vessel was removed of its removal, the fact that the person removing or storing
116 the vessel has the right to petition the court to foreclose a lien for all amounts owed, and
117 the fact that a court may order the sale of the vessel to satisfy such debt; or
118 (2) By advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in the county from where the
119 vessel was removed or, if there is no newspaper in such county, at the county courthouse
120 in such place where other public notices are posted, when an owner cannot be
121 ascertained. Such advertisement shall run in the newspaper once a week for two
H. B. 115 (SUB)
- 5 -

25 LC 39 4617S
122 consecutive weeks or shall remain posted at the courthouse for two consecutive weeks.
123 The advertisement shall contain a complete description of the vessel, its certificate of
124 number and hull identification number, the location from where such vessel was initially
125 removed, the present location of such vessel, the fact that if such vessel is not redeemed
126 within 30 days of its removal such vessel shall be deemed abandoned, the fact that the
127 person removing or storing the vessel has the right to petition the court to foreclose a lien
128 for all amounts owed, and the fact that a court may order the sale of the vessel to satisfy
129 such debt.
130 (e) If the person identified as the an owner fails to redeem such vessel as described in
131 subsection (d) of this Code section, or if a vessel being repaired by a repair facility or being
132 stored by an insurance company providing insurance to cover damages to the vessel
133 becomes abandoned, the person removing or storing such vessel shall, within seven
134 calendar days of the day such vessel became an abandoned vessel, give notice in writing,
135 by sworn statement, to the Department of Natural Resources stating the vessel certificate
136 of number, the hull identification number, the fact that such vessel is an abandoned vessel,
137 the model, year, and make of the vessel, if known or if readily ascertainable, the date the
138 vessel became an abandoned vessel, the date the vessel was removed, and the present
139 location of such vessel and requesting the name and address of all owners, lessors, lessees,
140 security interest holders, and lienholders of such vessel. If a person removing or storing
141 the vessel has knowledge of facts which reasonably indicate that the vessel is registered or
142 titled in a certain other state, such person shall check the vessel records of that other state
143 in the attempt to ascertain the identity of the owner of the vessel.
144 (e.1)(f)(1)(A) Upon notice to the Department of Natural Resources as described in
145 subsection (e) of this Code section, then the commissioner may revoke, suspend, deny,
146 or refuse to renew any vessel certificate of number or commercial fishing boat license
147 required by this title or Title 27 which is held by or has been applied for by the person
148 owner who holds the current registration for such vessel, until all fees connected with
H. B. 115 (SUB)
- 6 -

25 LC 39 4617S
149 removal and storage of the vessel have been paid and any lien acquired under Code
150 Section 52-7-73 for such fees has been satisfied. Such owner The person shall be
151 notified of the proposed order for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal
152 personally or by a letter sent by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the
153 name and address indicated on the application for the certificate of number or license,
154 or both. The proposed order for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal shall
155 become final 30 days after issuance if not appealed as provided in this paragraph.
156 (B) Any person whose vessel certificate of number or commercial fishing boat license
157 is proposed for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal under this paragraph shall
158 have the right to enter an appeal in the superior court of the county of his or her
159 residence or in the Superior Court of Fulton County. Such appeal shall name the
160 commissioner as defendant and must shall be filed within 30 days from the date the
161 notice of the proposed order was sent. The person filing the appeal shall neither be
162 required to post any bond nor to pay the costs in advance. If the person so desires, the
163 appeal may be heard by the judge at term or in chambers or by a jury at the first term.
164 The hearing on the appeal shall be de novo, but no appeal shall act as a supersedeas of
165 any orders or acts of the department.
166 (2)(A) Upon notice to the Department of Natural Resources as described in
167 subsection (e) of this Code section and delivery of a copy of such notice to the state
168 revenue commissioner, then the state revenue commissioner may revoke, suspend,
169 deny, or refuse to renew any motor vehicle registration required by Title 40 which is
170 held by or has been applied for by the person owner who holds the current registration
171 for such vessel, until all fees connected with removal and storage of the vessel have
172 been paid and any lien acquired under Code Section 52-7-73 for such fees has been
173 satisfied. Such owner The person shall be notified of the proposed order for revocation,
174 suspension, denial, or nonrenewal personally or by a letter sent by certified mail or
175 statutory overnight delivery to the name and address indicated on the application for the
H. B. 115 (SUB)
- 7 -

25 LC 39 4617S
176 registration. The proposed order for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal shall
177 become final 30 days after issuance if not appealed as provided in this paragraph.
178 (B) Any person whose motor vehicle registration is proposed for revocation,
179 suspension, denial, or nonrenewal under this paragraph shall have the right to enter an
180 appeal in the superior court of the county of his or her residence or in the Superior
181 Court of Fulton County. Such appeal shall name the state revenue commissioner as
182 defendant and must shall be filed within 30 days from the date the notice of the
183 proposed order was sent. The person filing the appeal shall neither be required to post
184 any bond nor to pay the costs in advance. If the person so desires, the appeal may be
185 heard by the judge at term or in chambers or by a jury at the first term. The hearing on
186 the appeal shall be de novo, but no appeal shall act as a supersedeas of any orders or
187 acts of the department.
188 (f) Upon ascertaining the owner of such vessel, the person removing or storing such vessel
189 shall, within five calendar days, by certified or registered mail or statutory overnight
190 delivery, notify the owner, lessors, lessees, security interest holders, and lienholders of the
191 vessel of the location of such vessel and of the fact that such vessel is deemed abandoned
192 and shall be disposed of if not redeemed.
193 (g) If the identity of the owner of such vessel cannot be ascertained, the person removing
194 or storing such vessel shall place an advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation
195 in the county where such vessel was obtained or, if there is no newspaper in such county,
196 shall post such advertisement at the county courthouse in such place where other public
197 notices are posted. Such advertisement shall run in the newspaper once a week for two
198 consecutive weeks or shall remain posted at the courthouse for two consecutive weeks.
199 The advertisement shall contain a complete description of the vessel, its certificate of
200 number and hull identification number, the location from where such vessel was initially
201 removed, the present location of such vessel, and the fact that such vessel is deemed
202 abandoned and shall be disposed of if not redeemed.
H. B. 115 (SUB)
- 8 -

25 LC 39 4617S
203 (h) Reserved.
204 (i)(g) Any person storing a vessel under the provisions of this Code section shall notify the
205 Department of Natural Resources if the vessel is recovered, is claimed by the owner, is
206 determined to be stolen, or is for any reason no longer an abandoned vessel. Such notice
207 shall be provided within seven calendar days of such event.
208 (j)(h) If vessel information on the abandoned vessel is not in the files of the Department
209 of Natural Resources, the department may require such other information or confirmation
210 as it determines is necessary or appropriate to determine the identity of the vessel.
211 (k)(i) Any person who does not provide the notice and information required by this Code
212 section shall not be entitled to any storage fees.
213 (l)(j) Any person who knowingly provides false or misleading information when providing
214 any notice or information as required by this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
215 and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as for a misdemeanor."
216 SECTION 5.
217 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 52-7-72, relating to authority of
218 peace officer to cause removal of unattended vessels, notifications, and duties, as follows:
219 "52-7-72.
220 (a) Any peace law enforcement officer who finds a vessel which has been left unattended
221 in or upon any public waters or other public property for a period of at least five days, if
222 such peace officer reasonably believes that the person who left such vessel unattended does
223 not intend to return and remove such vessel, shall notify the Department of Natural
224 Resources of such finding in accordance with subsection (d) of this Code section and as
225 evidenced by the date of issuance on the unattended vessel check card attached to such
226 vessel pursuant to Code Section 52-7-70.1, may cause such vessel to be removed to a
227 garage or other place of safety.
H. B. 115 (SUB)
- 9 -

25 LC 39 4617S
228 (b)(1) Any peace law enforcement officer who finds a vessel which has been left
229 unattended in or upon any public waters or other public property, when such vessel poses
230 a threat to public health or safety, shall notify the Department of Natural Resources of
231 such finding in accordance with subsection (d) of this Code section and may immediately
232 cause such vessel to be removed to a garage or other place of safety.
233 (2) Within 24 hours of causing an unattended vessel to be removed pursuant to
234 paragraph (1) of this subsection, the law enforcement officer causing such removal shall
235 query the criminal justice information system to determine if the unattended vessel has
236 been entered into the criminal justice information system as a stolen vessel. If the
237 removed vessel has been reported as stolen, the law enforcement officer shall notify the
238 law enforcement agency that filed such report, providing the location of the vessel or the
239 name of the person that removed the vessel. The law enforcement agency receiving such
240 notification shall then notify the person who filed the police report for the stolen vessel
241 of the location of the vessel.
242 (c) Any peace law enforcement officer who, under the provisions of this Code section,
243 causes any vessel to be removed to a garage or other place of safety shall be liable for gross
244 negligence only.
245 (d)(1) Any peace law enforcement officer who finds a vessel under such conditions as
246 described in subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall within 72 hours from the time
247 of such finding:
248 (A) Notify notify the Department of Natural Resources of the description of the vessel,
249 whether the vessel has been removed or not, and, if removed, the location to which such
250 vessel has been removed; and.
251 (B) If available on the Georgia Crime Information Center Network, determine the
252 name and address of the last known registered owner of such vessel. If vessel
253 information is not in the files of the Department of Natural Resources, the department
H. B. 115 (SUB)
- 10 -

25 LC 39 4617S
254 may require such other information or confirmation as it determines is necessary or
255 appropriate to determine the identity of the vessel.
256 (2) If any such vessel is determined to be a stolen vessel, the local law enforcement
257 officer or agency shall notify the Georgia Crime Information Center and the owner, if
258 known, of the location of such vessel within 72 hours after receiving notice that such
259 vessel is a stolen vessel.
260 (3) If the vessel is removed and the name and address of the last known registered owner
261 of the vessel is obtained from the Georgia Crime Information Center, the peace officer
262 who causes the vessel to be removed shall, within three calendar days of removal, make
263 available to the person removing such vessel the name and address of the last known
264 registered owner of such vessel. If such information is not available, the peace officer
265 shall, within three calendar days of removal, notify the person removing or storing such
266 vessel of such fact."
267 SECTION 6.
268 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 52-7-72.1, relating to penalty for
269 failing to remove unattended vessel, as follows:
270 "52-7-72.1.
271 (a)(1) If any vessel for which the Department of Natural Resources and the Georgia
272 Crime Information Center have has received notice pursuant to subsection (d) of Code
273 Section 52-7-72 has not been removed and is determined not to be a stolen vessel, the
274 commissioner may proceed to take action against the owner as provided by provisions
275 of this Code section shall apply.
276 (2) If any vessel for which the Department of Natural Resources and the Georgia Crime
277 Information Center have has received notice pursuant to subsection (d) of Code
278 Section 52-7-72 has been removed, the provisions of this Code section shall not apply
279 and the provisions of Code Section 52-7-71 shall apply instead.
H. B. 115 (SUB)
- 11 -

25 LC 39 4617S
280 (b)(1) Within seven calendar days of receipt of the notice required pursuant to
281 subsection (d) of Code Section 52-7-72 that a vessel has not been removed and has been
282 determined not be a stolen vessel, the Department of Natural Resources shall, by certified
283 or registered mail or statutory overnight delivery, notify the owner of the location of such
284 vessel and that if such vessel is not removed within 30 days the vessel will be deemed
285 abandoned under this article and:
286 (A) Shall be subject to a lien for actual or projected costs for the removal, storage, and
287 sale of such vessel;
288 (B) Failure to remove the vessel may result in the revocation, suspension, denial, or
289 refusal to renew a motor vehicle registration, vessel certificate of number, or
290 commercial fishing boat license of a vessel owner that has registered such vessel with
291 the Department of Natural Resources;
292 (C) That the owner shall be liable to the department for damages for the removal,
293 storage, and disposal of the vessel; and
294 (D) Failure to remove the vessel may result in the criminal prosecution of a vessel
295 owner that has registered such vessel with the Department of Natural Resources.
296 (2) The requirement for removal of a vessel within 30 days pursuant to this subsection
297 shall be inapplicable within 36 months of a declaration by the Governor of a state of
298 emergency due to a natural disaster affecting the location of the vessel.
299 (b)(c)(1)(A) The commissioner of the Department of Natural Resources shall be
300 authorized to Upon notice to the Department of Natural Resources as described in
301 subsection (d) of Code Section 52-7-72, then the commissioner may revoke, suspend,
302 deny, or refuse to renew any vessel certificate of number or commercial fishing boat
303 license required by this title or Title 27 which is held by or has been applied for by a
304 person who owns the vessel, until the owner a vessel owner that has registered such
305 vessel with the Department of Natural Resources which has become abandoned that has
306 been notified in accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section, until such person
H. B. 115 (SUB)
- 12 -

25 LC 39 4617S
307 restores and resumes operation of the vessel or removes it from public waters or public
308 property. The person shall be notified of the proposed order for revocation, suspension,
309 denial, or nonrenewal personally or by a letter sent by certified mail or statutory
310 overnight delivery to the name and address indicated on the application for the
311 certificate of number or license, or both. The proposed order for revocation,
312 suspension, denial, or nonrenewal shall become final 30 days after issuance if not
313 appealed as provided in this paragraph.
314 (B) Any person whose vessel certificate of number or commercial fishing boat license
315 is proposed for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal under this paragraph shall
316 have the right to enter an appeal in the superior court of the county of his or her
317 residence or in the Superior Court of Fulton County. Such appeal shall name the
318 commissioner as defendant and must shall be filed within 30 days from the date the
319 notice of the proposed order was sent. The person filing the appeal shall neither be
320 required to post any bond nor to pay the costs in advance. If the person so desires, the
321 appeal may be heard by the judge at term or in chambers or by a jury at the first term.
322 The hearing on the appeal shall be de novo, but no appeal shall act as a supersedeas of
323 any orders or acts of the department.
324 (2)(A) Upon notice to the Department of Natural Resources as described in
325 subsection (d) of Code Section 52-7-72 and delivery of a copy of such notice to the
326 state revenue commissioner, then the The state revenue commissioner may shall be
327 authorized to revoke, suspend, deny, or refuse to renew any motor vehicle registration
328 required by Title 40 which is held by or has been applied for by a person who owns the
329 vessel, until the owner a vessel owner that has registered such vessel with the
330 Department of Natural Resources which has become abandoned that has been notified
331 in accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section, until such person restores and
332 resumes operation of the vessel or removes it from public waters or public property.
333 The person shall be notified of the proposed order for revocation, suspension, denial,
H. B. 115 (SUB)
- 13 -

25 LC 39 4617S
334 or nonrenewal personally or by a letter sent by certified mail or statutory overnight
335 delivery to the name and address indicated on the application for the registration. The
336 proposed order for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal shall become final 30
337 days after issuance if not appealed as provided in this paragraph.
338 (B) Any person whose motor vehicle registration is proposed for revocation,
339 suspension, denial, or nonrenewal under this paragraph shall have the right to enter an
340 appeal in the superior court of the county of his or her residence or in the Superior
341 Court of Fulton County. Such appeal shall name the state revenue commissioner as
342 defendant and must shall be filed within 30 days from the date the notice of the
343 proposed order was sent. The person filing the appeal shall neither be required to post
344 any bond nor to pay the costs in advance. If the person so desires, the appeal may be
345 heard by the judge at term or in chambers or by a jury at the first term. The hearing on
346 the appeal shall be de novo, but no appeal shall act as a supersedeas of any orders or
347 acts of the department.
348 (d) Any vessel owner that has registered such vessel with the Department of Natural
349 Resources that fails to remove such vessel from public waters or public property within 30
350 days receipt of the notice issued pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall be
351 guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and, upon conviction thereof,
352 shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $5,000.00 or by confinement for a term not to
353 exceed 12 months, or both; provided, however, that the requirement for removal of a vessel
354 within 30 days pursuant to this subsection shall be inapplicable within 36 months of a
355 declaration by the Governor of a state of emergency due to a natural disaster affecting the
356 location of the vessel. Upon a second or subsequent offense for failure to remove an
357 abandoned vessel from public waters or public property, a vessel owner that has registered
358 such vessel with the Department of Natural Resources shall be guilty of a felony and, upon
359 conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $50,000.00 or by
360 imprisonment for a term not to exceed five years, or both. In addition to any other penalty
H. B. 115 (SUB)
- 14 -

25 LC 39 4617S
361 authorized by law for failure to remove an abandoned vessel from public waters or public
362 property, the court may order a person convicted pursuant to this subsection to make
363 restitution to Department of Natural Resources for the reasonable costs or damages
364 associated with failure to remove the vessel, including the cost of removal, storage, and
365 disposal of such vessel. Restitution made pursuant to this subsection shall not preclude the
366 Department of Natural Resources from obtaining any other civil or criminal remedy
367 available under any other provision of law. The restitution authorized by this Code section
368 shall be supplemental and not exclusive."
369 SECTION 7.
370 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 52-7-74, relating to procedure for
371 foreclosure, by revising paragraph (2) as follows:
372 "(2) The person desiring to foreclose a lien on an abandoned vessel shall, by certified or
373 registered mail or statutory overnight delivery, make a demand upon the owner for the
374 payment of the reasonable fees for removal and storage plus the costs of any
375 advertisement. Such written demand shall include an itemized statement of all charges.
376 No such written demand shall be required if the identity of the owner cannot be
377 ascertained and the notice requirements of paragraph (2) of subsection (g) (d) of Code
378 Section 52-7-71 have been complied with;"
379 SECTION 8.
380 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 115 (SUB)
- 15 -